Massachusetts, session 194th, S2908.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the trial court shall establish a 
sick leave bank for Shannon Manning, an employee of the Milford district court in the 
department of the trial court. Any employee of the department may voluntarily contribute 1 or 
more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave bank for use by Shannon Manning. If 
Shannon Manning terminates employment with the department or requests to dissolve the sick 
leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness 
leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or 
disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the trial 
court.